District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.06

Renewal.

(a)

A license or registration issued under this chapter shall expire on a date to be determined by the Commissioner. A license or registration may thereafter be renewed for one-year term extensions as provided by this section.

(b)

Before a license expires, the applicant may renew the license or registration for additional one-year terms, if the applicant:

(1)

Demonstrates that the applicant continues to meet the standards for licensing or registration under this chapter and under all relevant provisions of the Banking Code;

(2)

Pays all applicable fees as prescribed by the Commissioner and all third-party fees; and

(3)

Submits to the Commissioner a renewal application on the form that the Commissioner requires.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 7, 61 DCR 12577